New Jersey, session 221, A1160.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   There is established in the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs the "Southern New Jersey Homeless Veterans Shelter Grant Program."  The purpose of this program is to award grants to the three southern-most counties in this State for identifying and providing appropriate locations and property for the State to develop and operate shelters for homeless veterans.  The grants shall be awarded, subject to the availability of funds appropriated for the program, based upon the submission of applications by an eligible county in accordance with a process and criteria developed by the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs and monies appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose.  The application shall, at the minimum, include a description of the proposed location of a homeless veterans shelter and the property to be provided by the county to the State for development of a homeless veterans shelter.  The Adjutant General may adopt, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the grant program. As used in this section, the three southern-most counties means the counties of Atlantic, Cape May, and Cumberland. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.